Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-16] Guardian ad litem. (a) The
court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child to serve throughout the
pendency of child protective proceedings under this chapter.

(b) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem
for an incapacitated adult party, as set forth below:

(1) Upon the request of any party or sua sponte, the
court may order a professional evaluation of an adult party to determine the
party's capacity to substantially:

(A) Comprehend the legal significance of the
issues and nature of the proceedings under this chapter;

(B) Consult with counsel; and

(C) Assist in preparing the party's case or
strategy;

(2) If the court orders a professional evaluation,
the party shall be examined by a physician, psychologist, or other individual
appointed by the court who is qualified to evaluate the party's alleged
impairment:

(A) Unless otherwise directed by the court,
the examiner shall promptly file with the court a written report which shall
contain:

(i) A description of the nature, type, and
extent of the party's specific cognitive and functional capabilities and
limitations;

(ii) An evaluation of the party's mental and
physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive
behavior, and social skills;

(iii) A prognosis for improvement and a
recommendation as to the appropriate treatment or habilitation plan; and

(iv) The dates of any assessments or
examinations upon which the report is based;

(B) Upon the request of any party or sua
sponte, and after such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court may
appoint a guardian ad litem for an adult party only after a determination, by
clear and convincing evidence, that:

(i) The party is an incapacitated person; and

(ii) The party's identified needs cannot be met
by less restrictive means, including the use of appropriate and reasonably
available assistance.

(c) A guardian ad litem shall, unless
otherwise ordered by the court:

(1) Have access to the child or incapacitated adult;

(2) Have the authority to inspect and receive copies
of any records, notes, and electronic recordings concerning the child or
incapacitated adult that are relevant to the proceedings filed under this
chapter. This authority shall exist even without the consent of the child, incapacitated
adult, or individuals and authorized agencies that have control of the child or
incapacitated adult; provided that nothing in this section shall override any
attorney-client or attorney work product privilege;

(3) Be given notice of all hearings and proceedings
involving the child or incapacitated adult, whether civil or criminal,
including grand juries, and shall protect the best interests of the child or
incapacitated adult;

(4) Make face-to-face contact with the child or
incapacitated adult in the child's or incapacitated adult's family or resource
family home at least once every three months;

(5) Report to the court and all parties in writing at
six-month intervals, or as ordered by the court, regarding such guardian ad
litem's actions taken to ensure the child's or incapacitated adult's best
interest, and recommend how the court should proceed in the best interest of
that child or incapacitated adult; and

(6) Inform the court of the child's opinions and
requests. If the child's opinions and requests differ from those being
advocated by the guardian ad litem, the court shall evaluate and determine
whether it is in the child's best interests to appoint an attorney to serve as
the child's legal advocate concerning such issues and during such proceedings
as the court deems to be in the best interests of the child.

(d) The court shall, for an incapacitated
adult:

(1) Grant a guardian ad litem only those powers
necessitated by the incapacitated adult's limitations and demonstrated needs;
and

(2) Make appointive and other orders that will
encourage the development of the incapacitated adult's maximum self-reliance
and independence.

(e) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the
attorney for an incapacitated adult shall take instructions from the
incapacitated adult's guardian ad litem. The guardian ad litem for an
incapacitated adult shall inform the court of the incapacitated adult's
opinions and requests and may recommend how the court should proceed in the
best interest of the incapacitated adult.

(f) The fees and costs of a guardian ad litem
appointed pursuant to this section may be paid by the court, unless the party
for whom counsel is appointed has an independent estate sufficient to pay such
fees and costs. The court may order the appropriate parties to pay or
reimburse the fees and costs of the guardian ad litem and any attorney
appointed for the child. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next